Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.030

Petition to form—Contents.

A petition to form a district may be presented to the board of county commissioners and such petition shall include: (1) A description of the purposes of the petition; (2) a description of the purposes and powers of the proposed district; (3) a description of the boundaries of the proposed district; and (4) the signatures of more than fifty percent of the registered voters residing within the boundaries of the proposed district.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 3.]